Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB324.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1, 2, 4, 6 and 8 of the act of April 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1429, No.466), referred to as the Poultry Technician Licensure Law, are amended to read:Section 1. The Secretary of Agriculture, when he determines that there is a need for trained technicians to aid in [drawing blood from poultry to be used in pullorum testing programs, may license as many trained technicians as he deems necessary to aid the programs.] the collection of regulatory samples from poultry and eggs and conduct on-site surveillance for dangerous transmissible diseases of poultry, may license as many certified 1234567891011121314151617181920 poultry technicians as he deems necessary to carry out specified regulatory sampling and testing procedures. The Secretary of Agriculture may establish the licensing and certification standards, and the regulatory sampling and testing procedures, and may provide for training in Spanish, through the issuance of a general quarantine order under the authority of 3 Pa.C.S. § 2329 (relating to quarantine) . Section 2. Every applicant for licensure as a poultry technician shall furnish evidence that [he is] the applicant is at least eighteen years of age, [a citizen of the United States, or has legally declared his intention to become such, is of good moral character, has completed at least eight years of education in a public, parochial or private school, or its equivalent, as evaluated by the Department of Public Instruction, and has] can legally work in the United States in accordance with Federal and State law and has satisfactorily completed a course of training [in poultry blood-testing] as a certified poultry technician as prescribed by the Department of Agriculture.Section 4. No application for licensure as a poultry technician shall be considered unless accompanied by a fee of [five dollars ($5)] ten dollars ($10). Such licenses when issued shall be in force, unless revoked for cause, until January first of each year, at which time they may be renewed upon payment of the [five dollars ($5)] ten dollars ($10) fee if renewal application is approved by the Department of Agriculture.Appeals from any action of the Secretary of Agriculture, which results in a refusal to issue or renew, or in a suspension or revocation of a license, shall be taken in accordance with the provisions of [the act of June four, one thousand nine hundred forty-five (Pamphlet Laws 1388), known as the 20250HB0324PN0272 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Administrative Agency Law."] 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 6. The Secretary of Agriculture may (1) adopt and promulgate rules, quarantine orders and regulations governing the activities, methods and functions of all technicians licensed under the provisions of this act, and (2) suspend or revoke the license of any licensee who is (i) incompetent, (ii) fails to comply with the provisions of this act, quarantine orders or any rule or regulation of the secretary, or (iii) is intemperate in the use of stimulants, narcotics or any other substance which impairs the performance of his duties.[Section 8. A person licensed under the provisions of this act engaged to draw blood samples from poultry to be used in pullorum testing shall not be an employe of the owner of the poultry.]Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0324PN0272 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516